Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-239.05
Authority; nonprofit entity or subsidiary; powers and duties.

(1) In addition to the powers granted under section 58-239, the authority may:

(a) Support, establish, operate, manage, invest in, participate in, and own nonprofit entities, nonprofit subsidiaries, or other nonprofit consortia, in each case to further carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act, including with respect to projects for which financing or other resources are provided pursuant to the act; and

(b) Transfer assets of the authority to an entity created pursuant to this section.

(2) Unless otherwise provided by the authority, the debts, liabilities, and obligations of any such entity, subsidiary, or other consortium shall not be debts, liabilities, or obligations of the authority.

Laws 2026, LB768, § 2.
July 18, 2026